New York, session 2025-2026, S10460.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Section 6 of subpart B of part PP of chapter 59 of the 2 laws of 2021 amending the tax law and the state finance law relating to 3 establishing the New York city musical and theatrical production tax 4 credit and establishing the New York state council on the arts cultural 5 program fund, as amended by section 1 of part L of chapter 59 of the 6 laws of 2025, is amended to read as follows: 7 § 6. This act shall take effect immediately; provided however, that 8 sections one, two, three and four of this act shall apply to taxable 9 years beginning on or after January 1, 2021, and before January 1, 10 [2028] 2031 and shall expire and be deemed repealed January 1, [2028] 11 2031; provided further, however that the obligations under paragraph 3 12 of subdivision (g) of section 24-c of the tax law, as added by section 13 one of this act, shall remain in effect until December 31, [2029] 2032. 14 § 2. Paragraph 2 of subdivision (a) of section 24-c of the tax law, as 15 amended by section 2 of subpart E of part I of chapter 59 of the laws of 16 2023, is amended to read as follows: 17 (2) The amount of the credit shall be the product (or pro rata share 18 of the product, in the case of a member of a partnership) of twenty-five 19 percent and the sum of the qualified production expenditures paid for 20 during the qualified New York city musical and theatrical production's 21 credit period. Provided however that the amount of the credit cannot 22 exceed three hundred fifty thousand dollars per qualified New York city EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD09235-04-6 S. 10460 2 1 musical and theatrical production in a level two qualified New York city 2 production facility and three million dollars per qualified New York 3 city musical and theatrical production in a level one qualified New York 4 city production facility. In no event shall a qualified New York city 5 musical and theatrical production be eligible for more than one credit 6 under this program. Provided however, if a production located in a 7 level two production facility is approved for a credit under this 8 section and such production moves to a level one production facility, 9 any credit amount previously approved for the level two production shall 10 reduce any approved level one credit amount by such amount. A 11 production shall not have to withdraw a previous credit application if 12 such production moves from a level two production facility to a level 13 one production facility. 14 § 3. Subparagraph (i) of paragraph 3 of subdivision (b) of section 15 24-c of the tax law, as amended by section 2-a of subpart E of part I of 16 chapter 59 of the laws of 2023, is amended to read as follows: 17 (i) "Level one qualified New York city production facility" means a 18 facility located within the (A) borough of Manhattan, bounded by and 19 including forty-first street and [fifty-fourth] fifty-seventh street and 20 between sixth avenue and [ninth] tenth avenue, and bounded by and 21 including sixty-second street and sixty-fifth street between Columbus 22 Avenue and Amsterdam Avenue in which live theatrical productions are or 23 are intended to be primarily presented, (B) that contains at least one 24 stage, a seating capacity of five hundred or more seats, and dressing 25 rooms, storage areas, and other ancillary amenities necessary for the 26 qualified musical and theatrical production, and (C) for which receipts 27 attributable to live theatrical productions constitute seventy-five 28 percent or more of gross receipts of the facility. 29 § 4. Subparagraph (i) of paragraph 5 of subdivision (b) of section 30 24-c of the tax law, as amended by section 2 of part L of chapter 59 of 31 the laws of 2025, is amended to read as follows: 32 (i) "The credit period of a qualified New York city musical and theat- 33 rical production company" is the period starting on the production start 34 date and ending on the earlier of the date the qualified musical and 35 theatrical production has expended sufficient qualified production 36 expenditures to reach its credit cap, September thirtieth, two thousand 37 [twenty-seven] thirty or the date the qualified musical and theatrical 38 production closes. 39 § 5. Subdivision (c) of section 24-c of the tax law, as amended by 40 section 3 of part L of chapter 59 of the laws of 2025, is amended to 41 read as follows: 42 (c) The credit shall be allowed for the taxable year beginning on or 43 after January first, two thousand twenty-one but before January first, 44 two thousand [twenty-eight] thirty-one. A qualified New York city 45 musical and theatrical production company shall claim the credit in the 46 year in which its credit period ends. 47 § 6. Subdivision (f) of section 24-c of the tax law, as amended by 48 section 4 of part L of chapter 59 of the laws of 2025, is amended to 49 read as follows: 50 (f) Maximum amount of credits. (1) The aggregate amount of tax credits 51 allowed under this section, subdivision fifty-seven of section two 52 hundred ten-B and subsection (mmm) of section six hundred six of this 53 chapter shall be [four] eight hundred million dollars. Such aggregate 54 amount of credits shall be allocated by the department of economic 55 development among taxpayers based on the date of first performance of 56 the qualified musical and theatrical production. S. 10460 3 1 (2) The commissioner of economic development, after consulting with 2 the commissioner, shall promulgate regulations to establish procedures 3 for the allocation of tax credits as required by this section. Such 4 rules and regulations shall include provisions describing the applica- 5 tion process, the due dates for such applications, the standards that 6 will be used to evaluate the applications, the documentation that will 7 be provided by applicants to substantiate to the department the amount 8 of qualified production expenditures of such applicants, and such other 9 provisions as deemed necessary and appropriate. Notwithstanding any 10 other provisions to the contrary in the state administrative procedure 11 act, such rules and regulations may be adopted on an emergency basis. In 12 no event shall a qualified New York city musical and theatrical 13 production submit an application for this program after June thirtieth, 14 two thousand [twenty-seven] thirty. 15 § 7. Subdivision (g) of section 24-c of the tax law, as amended by 16 section 5-a of subpart E of part I of chapter 59 of the laws of 2023, is 17 amended to read as follows: 18 (g) Any qualified New York city musical and theatrical production 19 company that performs in a level one or level two qualified New York 20 city production facility and applies to receive a credit under this 21 section shall be required to: (1) participate in a New York state diver- 22 sity and arts job training program; (2) create and implement a plan to 23 ensure that their production is available and accessible for low-or 24 no-cost to low income New Yorkers; and (3) after the tax credit funds 25 have been received by the production, contribute to the New York state 26 council on the arts, cultural program fund an amount up to fifty percent 27 of the total credits received if its production earns ongoing revenue 28 prospectively after the end of the credit period that is at least equal 29 to two hundred percent of its ongoing production costs, with such amount 30 payable from twenty-five percent of net operating profits, such amounts 31 payable on a monthly basis, up until such fifty percent of the total 32 credit amount is reached, provided that for productions located in level 33 one production facilities, up to five hundred thousand dollars in aggre- 34 gate contributions in the amount of twenty-five hundred dollars per paid 35 performance week, pro-rated up or down in increments of one eighth on 36 the basis of eight performances per week, shall be payable prospectively 37 upon such production for productions located in level one production 38 facilities having presented paid public performances for a consecutive 39 twenty-four month (i.e. one hundred four paid performance weeks) period, 40 with such contributions deemed a credit against any contributions 41 required on the basis of net operating profits in this paragraph. Any 42 funds deposited pursuant to this subdivision may be used for arts and 43 cultural grant programs of the New York state council on the arts as 44 specified in subdivision five of section ninety-nine-ll of the state 45 finance law. 46 § 8. This act shall take effect immediately and shall apply to taxable 47 years beginning on or after January 1, 2027; provided, however, that the 48 amendments to section 24-c of the tax law made by sections two, three, 49 four, five, six and seven of this act shall not affect the repeal of 50 such section and shall be deemed repealed therewith.